Utah statutes.
17B-1-1207.   Findings, conclusions, and judgment -- Costs -- Effect of judgment -- Appeal.

(1)  After the hearing under Section 17B-1-1203 on a validation petition, the district court shall:

(a)  make and enter written findings of fact and conclusions of law; and

(b)  render a judgment as warranted.

(2)  A district court may apportion costs among the parties as the court determines appropriate.

(3)  A district court judgment adjudicating matters raised by a validation petition:

(a)  is binding and conclusive as to the local district and all other parties to the validation proceedings; and

(b)  constitutes a permanent injunction against any action or proceeding to contest any matter adjudicated in the validation proceedings.

(4) (a)  Each appeal of a final judgment in validation proceedings shall be filed with the Supreme Court.

(b)  An appeal of a final judgment in validation proceedings may be filed only by a party to the validation proceedings.

(c)  The appellate court hearing an appeal under this section shall expedite the hearing of the appeal.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

